Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.140

No receiver elected though indebtedness exists—Procedure.

If no receiver is elected upon the supposition that no indebtedness existed and it transpires that the municipality does have indebtedness or an outstanding liability, any interested person may file a petition in the superior court asking for the appointment of a receiver, and unless the indebtedness or liability is discharged, the court shall appoint some suitable person to act as receiver who shall qualify as required of any other receiver hereunder, within ten days from the date of his or her appointment.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2004; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.140. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 15; RRS s 8928.]